Massachusetts, session 194th, S2579.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after Section
244 the following section:-
Section 245. (a) For the purposes of the section, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following words shall have the following meanings:-
"DEHP." Di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate
"Health care practitioner." An individual who is authorized to practice some component
of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate or registration issued by a Commonwealth
licensing agency or board.
"Intentionally added DEHP." Either of the following:
of 4

(1) DEHP that a manufacturer has intentionally added to an intravenous solution
container or intravenous tubing product and that has a functional or technical effect on the
product.
"Intravenous solution container." A container used to house medicine, fluid or nutrition
therapy that is intravenously delivered to a patient in a hospital, outpatient facility or other health
care facility.
"Intravenous tubing." Tubing used to intravenously administer fluids, medication or
nutrients directly to an adult, child, or infant.
"Ortho-phthalate." A class of chemicals that are esters of ortho-phthalic acid, including
DEHP and any of the following:
(1) Benzyl-butyl phthalate (BBP)
(2) Dibutyl phthalate (DBP)
(3) Dicyclohexyl phthalate (DCHP)
(4) Diethyl phthalate (DEP)
(5) Di-isobutyl phthalate (DIBP)
(6) Di-isodecyl phthalate (DIDP)
(7) Di-isononyl phthalate (DINP)
(8) Di-n-hexyl phthalate (DnHP)
(9) Di-n-octyl phthalate (DNOP)
of 4

(10) Di-n-pentyl phthalate (DnPP)
(11) Diisoheptyl phthalate (DIHP)
“Unintentionally added DEHP.” DEHP in an intravenous solution container or
intravenous tubing product that is not used for functional or technical effect on the product.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2030, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell or
contribute into commerce in the Commonwealth intravenous solution containers made with
intentionally added DEHP.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2035, a person or entity shall not manufacture, sell or distribute
into commerce in the Commonwealth intravenous tubing made with intentionally added DEHP.
(d) A person or entity may not replace DEHP, pursuant to this section, with another
ortho-phthalate in a new or revised medical device.
(e) An intravenous solution container or intravenous tubing product shall not have
unintentionally added DEHP present at a quantity at or above 0.1 percent weight per weight
(w/w).
(f) The following items, as described in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, are
exempt from these provisions:-
(1) human blood collection and storage bags
(2) aspheresis and cell therapy blood kits and bags, including integral tubing
(g) A person or entity, due to pending United States Food and Drug Administration
approval for the DEHPfree intravenous solution container or due to the manufacturer not having
of 4

adequate equipment to manufacture the DEHPfree intravenous solution container, shall meet the
requirement in subsection (a) by January 1, 2032, if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The person or entity notified its Massachusetts customers, no later than Oct 1,
2025, that it has commenced development of the DEHPfree intravenous solution container to
meet the requirements of this section.
(2) The person or entity provides notice to its customers and posts to its official
internet website, no later than January 1, 2028, that it will not meet the deadline imposed
pursuant to subdivision (a).".
of 4